fxpp/enhufxpp.lexc
LEXICON Kozibee
közibé+FXPP+1N1P:közibém #;
közibé+FXPP+P1N1P:énközibém #;
közibé+FXPP+1N2P:közibéd #;
közibé+FXPP+P1N2P:teközibéd #;
közibé+FXPP+1N3P:közibé #;
közibé+FXPP+1N3P:közibéje #;
közibé+FXPP+P1N3P:őközibé #;
közibé+FXPP+P1N3P:őközibéje #;
közibé+FXPP+2N1P:közibénk #;
közibé+FXPP+P2N1P:miközibénk #;
közibé+FXPP+2N2P:közibétek #;
közibé+FXPP+P2N2P:tiközibétek #;
közibé+FXPP+2N3P:közibük #;
közibé+FXPP+P2N3P:őközibük #;
közibé+FXPP+2N3P:közibéjük #;
közibé+FXPP+P2N3P:őközibéjük #;

LEXICON Kozul
közül+FXPP+1N1P:közülem #;
közül+FXPP+P1N1P:énközülem #;
közül+FXPP+1N2P:közüled #;
közül+FXPP+P1N2P:teközüled #;
közül+FXPP+1N3P:közüle #;
közül+FXPP+1N3P:közül #;
közül+FXPP+P1N3P:őközüle #;
közül+FXPP+2N1P:közülünk #;
közül+FXPP+P2N1P:miközülünk #;
közül+FXPP+2N2P:közületek #;
közül+FXPP+P2N2P:tiközületek #;
közül+FXPP+2N3P:közülük #;
közül+FXPP+P2N3P:őközülük #;

LEXICON Kozt
közt+FXPP+1N1P:köztem #;
közt+FXPP+P1N1P:énköztem #;
közt+FXPP+1N2P:közted #;
közt+FXPP+P1N2P:teközted #;
közt+FXPP+1N3P:közte #;
közt+FXPP+P1N3P:őközte #;
közt+FXPP+2N1P:köztünk #;
közt+FXPP+P2N1P:miköztünk #;
közt+FXPP+2N2P:köztetek #;
közt+FXPP+P2N2P:tiköztetek #;
közt+FXPP+2N3P:köztük #;
közt+FXPP+P2N3P:őköztük #;

LEXICON Mellett
mellett+FXPP+1N1P:mellettem #;
mellett+FXPP+P1N1P:énmellettem #;
mellett+FXPP+1N2P:melletted #;
mellett+FXPP+P1N2P:temelletted #;
mellett+FXPP+1N3P:mellette #;
mellett+FXPP+P1N3P:őmellette #;
mellett+FXPP+1N3P:mellett #;
mellett+FXPP+2N1P:mellettünk #;
mellett+FXPP+P2N1P:mimellettünk #;
mellett+FXPP+2N2P:mellettetek #;
mellett+FXPP+P2N2P:timellettetek #;
mellett+FXPP+2N3P:mellettük #;
mellett+FXPP+P2N3P:őmellettük #;

LEXICON Mellee
mellé+FXPP+1N1P:mellém #;
mellé+FXPP+P1N1P:énmellém #;
mellé+FXPP+1N2P:melléd #;
mellé+FXPP+P1N2P:temelléd #;
mellé+FXPP+1N3P:mellé #;
mellé+FXPP+P1N3P:őmellé #;
mellé+FXPP+1N3P:melléje #;
mellé+FXPP+P1N3P:őmelléje #;
mellé+FXPP+2N1P:mellénk #;
mellé+FXPP+P2N1P:mimellénk #;
mellé+FXPP+2N2P:mellétek #;
mellé+FXPP+P2N2P:timellétek #;
mellé+FXPP+2N3P:melléjük #;
mellé+FXPP+P2N3P:őmelléjük #;

LEXICON Melloel
mellől+FXPP+1N1P:mellőlem #;
mellől+FXPP+P1N1P:énmellőlem #;
mellől+FXPP+1N2P:mellőled #;
mellől+FXPP+P1N2P:temellőled #;
mellől+FXPP+1N3P:mellőle #;
mellől+FXPP+P1N3P:őmellőle #;
mellől+FXPP+1N3P:mellől #;
mellől+FXPP+2N1P:mellőlünk #;
mellől+FXPP+P2N1P:mimellőlünk #;
mellől+FXPP+2N2P:mellőletek #;
mellől+FXPP+P2N2P:timellőletek #;
mellől+FXPP+2N3P:mellőlük #;
mellől+FXPP+P2N3P:őmellőlük #;

LEXICON Utan
után+FXPP+1N1P:utánam #;
után+FXPP+P1N1P:énutánam #;
után+FXPP+1N2P:utánad #;
után+FXPP+P1N2P:teutánad #;
után+FXPP+1N3P:utána #;
után+FXPP+P1N3P:őutána #;
után+FXPP+1N3P:után #;
után+FXPP+2N1P:utánunk #;
után+FXPP+P2N1P:miutánunk #;
után+FXPP+2N2P:utánatok #;
után+FXPP+P2N2P:tiutánatok #;
után+FXPP+2N3P:utánuk #;
után+FXPP+P2N3P:őutánuk #;

LEXICON Mogul
mögül+FXPP+1N1P:mögülem #;
mögül+FXPP+P1N1P:énmögülem #;
mögül+FXPP+1N2P:mögüled #;
mögül+FXPP+P1N2P:temögüled #;
mögül+FXPP+1N3P:mögüle #;
mögül+FXPP+1N3P:mögül #;
mögül+FXPP+P1N3P:őmögüle #;
mögül+FXPP+2N1P:mögülünk #;
mögül+FXPP+P2N1P:mimögülünk #;
mögül+FXPP+2N2P:mögületek #;
mögül+FXPP+P2N2P:timögületek #;
mögül+FXPP+2N3P:mögülük #;
mögül+FXPP+P2N3P:őmögülük #;

LEXICON Moge
mögé+FXPP+1N1P:mögém #;
mögé+FXPP+P1N1P:énmögém #;
mögé+FXPP+1N2P:mögéd #;
mögé+FXPP+P1N2P:temögéd #;
mögé+FXPP+1N3P:mögé #;
mögé+FXPP+P1N3P:őmögé #;
mögé+FXPP+1N3P:mögéje #;
mögé+FXPP+P1N3P:őmögéje #;
mögé+FXPP+2N1P:mögénk #;
mögé+FXPP+P2N1P:mimögénk #;
mögé+FXPP+2N2P:mögétek #;
mögé+FXPP+P2N2P:timögétek #;
mögé+FXPP+2N3P:mögéjük #;
mögé+FXPP+P2N3P:őmögéjük #;

LEXICON Mogott
mögött+FXPP+1N1P:mögöttem #;
mögött+FXPP+P1N1P:énmögöttem #;
mögött+FXPP+1N2P:mögötted #;
mögött+FXPP+P1N2P:temögötted #;
mögött+FXPP+1N3P:mögött #;
mögött+FXPP+1N3P:mögötte #;
mögött+FXPP+P1N3P:őmögötte #;
mögött+FXPP+2N1P:mögöttünk #;
mögött+FXPP+P2N1P:mimögöttünk #;
mögött+FXPP+2N2P:mögöttetek #;
mögött+FXPP+P2N2P:timögöttetek #;
mögött+FXPP+2N3P:mögöttük #;
mögött+FXPP+P2N3P:őmögöttük #;

LEXICON Elott
előtt+FXPP+1N1P:előttem #;
előtt+FXPP+P1N1P:énelőttem #;
előtt+FXPP+1N2P:előtted #;
előtt+FXPP+P1N2P:teelőtted #;
előtt+FXPP+1N3P:előtt #;
előtt+FXPP+1N3P:előtte #;
előtt+FXPP+P1N3P:őelőtte #;
előtt+FXPP+2N1P:előttünk #;
előtt+FXPP+P2N1P:mielőttünk #;
előtt+FXPP+2N2P:előttetek #;
előtt+FXPP+P2N2P:tielőttetek #;
előtt+FXPP+2N3P:előttük #;
előtt+FXPP+P2N3P:őelőttük #;

LEXICON Elol
elől+FXPP+1N1P:előlem #;
elől+FXPP+P1N1P:énelőlem #;
elől+FXPP+1N2P:előled #;
elől+FXPP+P1N2P:teelőled #;
elől+FXPP+1N3P:elől #;
elől+FXPP+1N3P:előle #;
elől+FXPP+P1N3P:őelőle #;
elől+FXPP+2N1P:előlünk #;
elől+FXPP+P2N1P:mielőlünk #;
elől+FXPP+2N2P:előletek #;
elől+FXPP+P2N2P:tielőletek #;
elől+FXPP+2N3P:előlük #;
elől+FXPP+P2N3P:őelőlük #;

LEXICON Ele
elé+FXPP+1N1P:elém #;
elé+FXPP+P1N1P:énelém #;
elé+FXPP+1N2P:eléd #;
elé+FXPP+P1N2P:teeléd #;
elé+FXPP+1N3P:elé #;
elé+FXPP+P1N3P:őelé #;
elé+FXPP+1N3P:eléje #;
elé+FXPP+P1N3P:őeléje #;
elé+FXPP+2N1P:elénk #;
elé+FXPP+P2N1P:mielénk #;
elé+FXPP+2N2P:elétek #;
elé+FXPP+P2N2P:tielétek #;
elé+FXPP+2N3P:eléjük #;
elé+FXPP+P2N3P:őeléjük #;

LEXICON Elebe
elé+FXPP+1N1P+Ill:elémbe #;
elé+FXPP+P1N1P+Ill:énelémbe #;
elé+FXPP+1N2P+Ill:elédbe #;
elé+FXPP+P1N2P+Ill:teelédbe #;
elé+FXPP+1N3P+Ill:elébe #;
elé+FXPP+P1N3P+Ill:őelébe #;
elé+FXPP+2N1P+Ill:elénkbe #;
elé+FXPP+P2N1P+Ill:mielénkbe #;
elé+FXPP+2N2P+Ill:elétekbe #;
elé+FXPP+P2N2P+Ill:tielétekbe #;
elé+FXPP+2N3P+Ill:eléjükbe #;
elé+FXPP+P2N3P+Ill:őeléjükbe #;

LEXICON Eleebe
elébe+FXPP+1N1P:elébem #;
elébe+FXPP+P1N1P:énelébem #;
elébe+FXPP+1N2P:elébed #;
elébe+FXPP+P1N2P:teelébed #;
elébe+FXPP+1N3P:elébe #;
elébe+FXPP+P1N3P:őelébe #;
elébe+FXPP+2N1P:elébünk #;
elébe+FXPP+P2N1P:mielébünk #;
elébe+FXPP+2N2P:elébetek #;
elébe+FXPP+P2N2P:tielébetek #;
elébe+FXPP+2N3P:elébük #;
elébe+FXPP+P2N3P:őelébük #;

LEXICON Elejbe
elejbe+FXPP+1N1P:elejbem #;
elejbe+FXPP+P1N1P:énelejbem #;
elejbe+FXPP+1N2P:elejbed #;
elejbe+FXPP+P1N2P:teelejbed #;
elejbe+FXPP+1N3P:elejbe #;
elejbe+FXPP+P1N3P:őelejbe #;
elejbe+FXPP+2N1P:elejbünk #;
elejbe+FXPP+P2N1P:mielejbünk #;
elejbe+FXPP+2N2P:elejbetek #;
elejbe+FXPP+P2N2P:tielejbetek #;
elejbe+FXPP+2N3P:elejbük #;
elejbe+FXPP+P2N3P:őelejbük #;

LEXICON Elejbee
elejbé+FXPP+1N1P:elejbém #;
elejbé+FXPP+P1N1P:énelejbém #;
elejbé+FXPP+1N2P:elejbéd #;
elejbé+FXPP+P1N2P:teelejbéd #;
elejbé+FXPP+1N3P:elejbé #;
elejbé+FXPP+P1N3P:őelejbé #;
elejbé+FXPP+2N1P:elejbünk #;
elejbé+FXPP+P2N1P:mielejbünk #;
elejbé+FXPP+2N2P:elejbétek #;
elejbé+FXPP+P2N2P:tielejbétek #;
elejbé+FXPP+2N3P:elejbük #;
elejbé+FXPP+P2N3P:őelejbük #;

LEXICON Elibe
elibe+FXPP+1N1P:elibem #;
elibe+FXPP+P1N1P:énelibem #;
elibe+FXPP+1N2P:elibed #;
elibe+FXPP+P1N2P:teelibed #;
elibe+FXPP+1N3P:elibe #;
elibe+FXPP+P1N3P:őelibe #;
elibe+FXPP+2N1P:elibünk #;
elibe+FXPP+P2N1P:mielibünk #;
elibe+FXPP+2N2P:elibetek #;
elibe+FXPP+P2N2P:tielibetek #;
elibe+FXPP+2N3P:elibük #;
elibe+FXPP+P2N3P:őelibük #;

LEXICON Elibee
elibé+FXPP+1N1P:elibém #;
elibé+FXPP+P1N1P:énelibém #;
elibé+FXPP+1N2P:elibéd #;
elibé+FXPP+P1N2P:teelibéd #;
elibé+FXPP+1N3P:elibé #;
elibé+FXPP+P1N3P:őelibé #;
elibé+FXPP+1N3P:elibéje #;
elibé+FXPP+P1N3P:őelibéje #;
elibé+FXPP+2N1P:elibünk #;
elibé+FXPP+P2N1P:mielibünk #;
elibé+FXPP+2N2P:elibetek #;
elibé+FXPP+P2N2P:tielibetek #;
elibé+FXPP+2N3P:elibük #;
elibé+FXPP+P2N3P:őelibük #;

LEXICON Nelkul
nélkül+FXPP+1N1P:nélkülem #;
nélkül+FXPP+P1N1P:énnélkülem #;
nélkül+FXPP+1N2P:nélküled #;
nélkül+FXPP+P1N2P:tenélküled #;
nélkül+FXPP+1N3P:nélkül #;
nélkül+FXPP+1N3P:nélküle #;
nélkül+FXPP+P1N3P:őnélküle #;
nélkül+FXPP+2N1P:nélkülünk #;
nélkül+FXPP+P2N1P:minélkülünk #;
nélkül+FXPP+2N2P:nélkületek #;
nélkül+FXPP+P2N2P:tinélkületek #;
nélkül+FXPP+2N3P:nélkülük #;
nélkül+FXPP+P2N3P:őnélkülük #;

LEXICON Kivul
kívül+FXPP+1N1P:kívülem #;
kívül+FXPP+P1N1P:énkívülem #;
kívül+FXPP+1N2P:kívüled #;
kívül+FXPP+P1N2P:tekívüled #;
kívül+FXPP+1N3P:kívüle #;
kívül+FXPP+P1N3P:őkívüle #;
kívül+FXPP+2N1P:kívülünk #;
kívül+FXPP+P2N1P:mikívülünk #;
kívül+FXPP+2N2P:kívületek #;
kívül+FXPP+P2N2P:tikívületek #;
kívül+FXPP+2N3P:kívülük #;
kívül+FXPP+P2N3P:őkívülük #;

LEXICON Miatt
miatt+FXPP+1N1P:miattam #;
miatt+FXPP+P1N1P:énmiattam #;
miatt+FXPP+1N2P:miattad #;
miatt+FXPP+P1N2P:temiattad #;
miatt+FXPP+1N3P:miatta #;
miatt+FXPP+1N3P:miatt #;
miatt+FXPP+P1N3P:őmiatta #;
miatt+FXPP+2N1P:miattunk #;
miatt+FXPP+P2N1P:mimiattunk #;
miatt+FXPP+2N2P:miattatok #;
miatt+FXPP+P2N2P:timiattatok #;
miatt+FXPP+2N3P:miattuk #;
miatt+FXPP+P2N3P:őmiattuk #;

LEXICON Erett
érett+FXPP+1N1P:érettem #;
érett+FXPP+P1N1P:énérettem #;
érett+FXPP+1N2P:éretted #;
érett+FXPP+P1N2P:teéretted #;
érett+FXPP+1N3P:érette #;
érett+FXPP+1N3P:érett #;
érett+FXPP+P1N3P:őérette #;
érett+FXPP+2N1P:érettünk #;
érett+FXPP+P2N1P:miérettünk #;
érett+FXPP+2N2P:érettetek #;
érett+FXPP+P2N2P:tiérettetek #;
érett+FXPP+2N3P:érettük #;
érett+FXPP+P2N3P:őérettük #;

LEXICON Irant
iránt+FXPP+1N1P:irántam #;
iránt+FXPP+P1N1P:énirántam #;
iránt+FXPP+1N2P:irántad #;
iránt+FXPP+P1N2P:teirántad #;
iránt+FXPP+1N3P:iránta #;
iránt+FXPP+1N3P:iránt #;
iránt+FXPP+P1N3P:őiránta #;
iránt+FXPP+2N1P:irántunk #;
iránt+FXPP+P2N1P:miirántunk #;
iránt+FXPP+2N2P:irántatok #;
iránt+FXPP+P2N2P:tiirántatok #;
iránt+FXPP+2N3P:irántuk #;
iránt+FXPP+P2N3P:őirántuk #;

LEXICON Szerinte
szerinte+FXPP+1N1P:szerintem #;
szerinte+FXPP+P1N1P:énszerintem #;
szerinte+FXPP+1N2P:szerinted #;
szerinte+FXPP+P1N2P:teszerinted #;
szerinte+FXPP+1N3P:szerinte #;
szerinte+FXPP+1N3P:szerint #;
szerinte+FXPP+P1N3P:őszerinte #;
szerinte+FXPP+2N1P:szerintünk #;
szerinte+FXPP+P2N1P:miszerintünk #;
szerinte+FXPP+2N2P:szerintetek #;
szerinte+FXPP+P2N2P:tiszerintetek #;
szerinte+FXPP+2N3P:szerintük #;
szerinte+FXPP+P2N3P:őszerintük #;

LEXICON Kore
köré+FXPP+1N1P:körém #;
köré+FXPP+P1N1P:énkörém #;
köré+FXPP+1N2P:köréd #;
köré+FXPP+P1N2P:teköréd #;
köré+FXPP+1N3P:köré #;
köré+FXPP+1N3P:köréje #;
köré+FXPP+P1N3P:őköré #;
köré+FXPP+P1N3P:őköréje #;
köré+FXPP+2N1P:körénk #;
köré+FXPP+P2N1P:mikörénk #;
köré+FXPP+2N2P:körétek #;
köré+FXPP+P2N2P:tikörétek #;
köré+FXPP+2N3P:köréjük #;
köré+FXPP+P2N3P:őköréjük #;

LEXICON Korul
körül+FXPP+1N1P:körülem #;
körül+FXPP+P1N1P:énkörülem #;
körül+FXPP+1N2P:körüled #;
körül+FXPP+P1N2P:tekörüled #;
körül+FXPP+1N3P:körül #;
körül+FXPP+1N3P:körüle #;
körül+FXPP+P1N3P:őkörüle #;
körül+FXPP+2N1P:körülünk #;
körül+FXPP+P2N1P:mikörülünk #;
körül+FXPP+2N2P:körületek #;
körül+FXPP+P2N2P:tikörületek #;
körül+FXPP+2N3P:körülük #;
körül+FXPP+P2N3P:őkörülük #;

LEXICON Korulott
körülött+FXPP+1N1P:körülöttem #;
körülött+FXPP+P1N1P:énkörülöttem #;
körülött+FXPP+1N2P:körülötted #;
körülött+FXPP+P1N2P:tekörülötted #;
körülött+FXPP+1N3P:körülötte #;
körülött+FXPP+P1N3P:őkörülötte #;
körülött+FXPP+2N1P:körülöttünk #;
körülött+FXPP+P2N1P:mikörülöttünk #;
körülött+FXPP+2N2P:körülöttetek #;
körülött+FXPP+P2N2P:tikörülöttetek #;
körülött+FXPP+2N3P:körülöttük #;
körülött+FXPP+P2N3P:őkörülöttük #;

LEXICON Korott
körött+FXPP+1N1P:köröttem #;
körött+FXPP+P1N1P:énköröttem #;
körött+FXPP+1N2P:körötted #;
körött+FXPP+P1N2P:tekörötted #;
körött+FXPP+1N3P:körötte #;
körött+FXPP+1N3P:körött #;
körött+FXPP+P1N3P:őkörötte #;
körött+FXPP+2N1P:köröttünk #;
körött+FXPP+P2N1P:miköröttünk #;
körött+FXPP+2N2P:köröttetek #;
körött+FXPP+P2N2P:tiköröttetek #;
körött+FXPP+2N3P:köröttük #;
körött+FXPP+P2N3P:őköröttük #;

LEXICON Helyett
helyett+FXPP+1N1P:helyettem #;
helyett+FXPP+P1N1P:énhelyettem #;
helyett+FXPP+1N2P:helyetted #;
helyett+FXPP+P1N2P:tehelyetted #;
helyett+FXPP+1N3P:helyette #;
helyett+FXPP+1N3P:helyett #;
helyett+FXPP+P1N3P:őhelyette #;
helyett+FXPP+2N1P:helyettünk #;
helyett+FXPP+P2N1P:mihelyettünk #;
helyett+FXPP+2N2P:helyettetek #;
helyett+FXPP+P2N2P:tihelyettetek #;
helyett+FXPP+2N3P:helyettük #;
helyett+FXPP+P2N3P:őhelyettük #;
